Alaska, session 34, SB62.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 33.16.020(a) is amended to read: 04 (a) There is in the Department of Corrections a board of parole consisting of 05 seven [FIVE] members appointed by the governor, subject to confirmation by a 06 majority of members of the legislature in joint session. 07 * Sec. 2. AS 33.16.020(b) is amended to read: 08 (b) Members of the board serve for staggered terms of five years and may not 09 serve more than two terms [UNTIL THEIR SUCCESSORS ARE APPOINTED]. 10 * Sec. 3. AS 33.16.030(b) is repealed and reenacted to read: 11 (b) The board consists of seven members, including 12 (1) one licensed physician, psychologist, or psychiatrist; 13 (2) one victim of a crime, family member of a victim of a crime, or a 14 member of a crime victims advocacy group; 15 (3) one member who has experience in providing drug or alcohol 01 addiction recovery support or who has personal experience with drug or alcohol 02 addiction; and 03 (4) one member of a federally recognized tribe in the state. 04 * Sec. 4. AS 33.16.030(c) is amended to read: 05 (c) Officers or employees of the state may not be appointed to the board. Not 06 more than three members of the board may be current or former employees of a 07 federal or private entity that operates a correctional facility or former employees 08 of a state entity that operates a correctional facility. 09 * Sec. 5. AS 33.16.030 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 10 (d) In this section, 11 (1) "crime" means an offense for which a sentence of imprisonment is 12 authorized; a crime is either a felony or a misdemeanor; 13 (2) "federally recognized tribe" has the meaning given in 14 AS 23.20.520. 15 * Sec. 6. AS 33.16 is amended by adding a new section to read: 16 Sec. 33.16.280. Annual report. (a) Not later than the 30th day following the 17 convening of each regular session of the legislature, the board shall prepare an annual 18 report of its operations and all parole hearings conducted in the preceding calendar 19 year and deliver the report to the senate secretary and the chief clerk of the house of 20 representatives and notify the legislature that the report is available. The board shall 21 also deliver the report to the Alaska Criminal Justice Data Analysis Commission and 22 publish the report on its publicly available Internet website. The report must include 23 information on discretionary parole hearings, special medical and geriatric parole 24 hearings, parole revocations, and parole discharges for the preceding calendar year. 25 (b) The information required in the annual report relating to all parole hearings 26 must include 27 (1) the number of each type of hearing held; 28 (2) the number of each type of hearing that resulted in parole being 29 granted, denied, or continued; 30 (3) applicant demographic data, including age, gender, race, and 31 ethnicity, for each type of hearing outcome; 01 (4) data on the applicant's most serious offense and whether a parole 02 request was granted, denied, or continued; 03 (5) a summary of the statutory or regulatory criteria the board most 04 frequently used in making its decisions; 05 (6) data on parole revocations, including specific violations that led to 06 revocation; 07 (7) information on why a parole request was denied; 08 (8) data on the amount of time a person served on parole before a 09 discharge was granted; and 10 (9) the voting record of each member of the board for each type of 11 hearing. 12 * Sec. 7. AS 33.16.085(a)(2)(C), 33.16.100(a)(4), and 33.16.100(g)(4) are repealed. 13 * Sec. 8. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 14 read: 15 APPLICABILITY. The repeal of AS 33.16.085(a)(2)(C), 33.16.100(a)(4), and 16 33.16.100(g)(4) by sec. 7 of this Act apply to all parole applications submitted on or after the 17 effective date of this Act for conduct occurring before, on, or after the effective date of this 18 Act. 19 * Sec. 9. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 20 read: 21 TRANSITION; APPOINTMENTS. (a) Notwithstanding AS 33.16.020(b), as 22 amended by sec. 2 of this Act, a member of the board on the effective date of this Act who 23 has previously served two or more terms or is currently serving a second term may finish the 24 term to which the member was appointed, but may not be reappointed. 25 (b) Notwithstanding AS 33.16.030(b), as repealed and reenacted by sec. 3 of this Act, 26 a member of the board on the effective date of this Act may continue to serve the term to 27 which the member was appointed. 28 (c) In this section, "board" means the board of parole. 29 * Sec. 10. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.